District of Columbia statutes.
46-726

Repealed

Effect of foreign support order.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, Pub. L. 85-94, § 24b
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(f)(4), 33 DCR 6710
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748
1981 Ed., § 30-326.